California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
Prior to each July 15, the department shall prepare and forward to the Controller a report identifying the amounts to be deducted from the allocations under Sections 2104 and 2107 as provided in Sections 2104.1 and 2107.6. The amounts reported shall be the amount of funds allocated to cities for grade separation projects included in allocations to cities made pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2450) of Division 3 in the preceding fiscal year and the amount of funds allocated to counties for grade separation projects included in allocations to counties made pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2450) of Division 3 in the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 315, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

191.5.

Any city, city and county, or county may use funds allocated from the State Highway Account or the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund to finance the local governmental entity’s share of the cost of constructing protective facilities on all mainline grade crossings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

192.

In apportioning the State Highway Account money as required by this article, there shall be excluded, from the computations of moneys expended, any sums contributed by any person or governmental unit to pay any portion of the cost of constructing, improving, or maintaining any state highway.

Except as otherwise permitted in this article, any annual or biennial balances remaining unexpended to the credit of any particular county group shall remain credited to such county group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

193.

The State Highway Account money allocated and available each year for state highways shall be expended by the department:

(a) On the locations determined by the commission, to acquire the necessary real property or interests therein for, and to construct or improve to standards justified by traffic requirements, the state highways in the state highway system.

(b) To construct or improve highways in state parks in the manner provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

194.

Each annual proposed budget prepared pursuant to Section 165 shall include an amount recommended to be appropriated to the Transportation Planning and Development Account in the State Transportation Fund. The amount shall, to the extent possible, equal the pro rata share of the comprehensive transportation planning duties attributable to highway and to exclusive public mass transit guideway planning and development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

203.

It is the intent of the Legislature that each annual proposed budget prepared pursuant to Section 165 include state funds from the State Highway Account for the California Transportation Research and Innovation Program, in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 14450) of Part 5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. These funds shall be identified as a distinct line-item in each proposed budget and shall be in addition to existing research and development conducted by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 352, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

204.

The department shall exercise the same powers and duties with respect to State highways within cities as with respect to other State highways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 642.)
-------------------------------------------

207.

The commission may, by resolution, provide a plan under which the department may invest presently unneeded money in the State Highway Account in bonds or interest-bearing notes or obligations of the United States for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for the payment of principal and interest, in time bank deposits in eligible banks described in Section 16500 of the Government Code, in deposits in eligible savings and loan associations described in Section 16600 of the Government Code, or in any securities of federal agencies described in Section 16430 of the Government Code. The department may, with the approval of the State Treasurer, invest such excess funds in accordance with the resolution. All such bonds, notes, or obligations purchased under the provisions of this section shall be delivered to the State Treasurer, who shall keep them as a portion of the State Highway Account, and all interest thereon when collected shall be paid into and become a part of the State Highway Account.

All investments made under this section shall be liquidated as soon as the funds invested are required for state highway purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

208.

The Controller shall, from time to time, determine whether any portion of the money or investment in the Department of Motor Vehicles Uncleared Collections Account in the Special Deposit Fund is not necessary for immediate use and, if so, the amount thereof shall thereupon be designated as “available money.” On demand of the Department of Transportation from time to time, the amounts demanded, not exceeding ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in the aggregate, shall, on order of the Controller, be transferred to the State Highway Account from the “available money” and shall be available for the acquisition of properties to constitute rights-of-way for state highway purposes. On demand of the Controller, the money shall be retransferred to the Department of Motor Vehicles Uncleared Collections Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 61.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Freeway Noise Attenuation [215.5. - 216.5.]

215.5.

(a) The department shall develop and implement a system of priorities for ranking the need for installation of noise attenuation barriers along freeways in the California freeway and expressway system. In establishing a priority system, the department shall give the highest consideration to residential areas which were developed prior to the opening of the freeway. If alterations have been made to the freeway since its original opening which result in a significant and measurable increase in ambient noise levels, the opening date for that segment of the freeway, for the purposes of determining priorities under this section, is the completion date of that alteration project. Other criteria for determining priorities shall include the existing and future intensity of sound generated by the freeway, the increase in traffic flow since the original construction of the freeway, the cost of building the soundwall in relation to the expected noise reduction, the number of persons living in close proximity to the freeway, and whether a majority of the occupants in close proximity to the freeway resided there prior to the time the freeway routing was adopted by the commission. The city or county in which the residential area is located shall be responsible for providing documentation to the department on the percentage of original occupants still residing along the freeway. 

The actual cost of construction shall be used in determining the relative priority ranking of projects funded and constructed pursuant to subdivision (d). 

(b) When all freeways have been ranked in priority order, the department shall, consistent with available funding, include in its proposed state transportation improvement program, a program of construction of noise attenuation barriers beginning with the highest priority. 

In preparing the annual priority list, the department shall not add any new project to the list ahead of a project that has been funded by a city or county, or by any other public agency using public funds, and is awaiting state reimbursement pursuant to subdivision (d). 

(c) The commission shall include in the estimate adopted pursuant to Section 14525 of the Government Code an annual and five-year estimate of funds estimated to be available for noise attenuation barriers along freeways. If any city or county constructs a noise attenuation barrier along a freeway pursuant to subdivision (d), the commission shall allocate funds for the project in the fiscal year the project would have been eligible for funding based on the department’s priority list and the commission’s fund estimate at the time of approval of the project pursuant to subdivision (d). 

(d) If any city, county, or public agency constructs a noise attenuation barrier along a freeway using public funds prior to the time that the barrier reaches a high enough priority for state funding, then, when the funding priority is reached, the department shall reimburse the city, county, or public agency without interest for the cost of construction, but the reimbursement may not exceed the cost of the department to construct the barriers. Reimbursement shall be made only if the city, county, or public agency constructs the noise attenuation barrier to the standards approved by department, follows bidding and contracting procedures approved by the department, and the project is approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1107, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

215.6.

If any city or county contributes at least 33 percent of the estimated cost of any soundwall project included for the first time in the state transportation improvement program in 1992 or in subsequent years, that project shall be given priority over all other soundwall projects to be included for the first time in that state transportation improvement program. If, due to the accelerated priority given a project by this section, two or more projects each qualify for the highest priority, the relative ranking between the two projects shall be determined on the basis of their relative ranking prior to being accelerated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1107, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

215.7.

(a) In the event of the destruction of any segment of a state highway due to a natural disaster, when that segment remains out of service for five years or more, the department may, for purposes of mitigating the effects of increased traffic and noise on alternate state highways, use funds from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund sufficient in amount to meet the state’s required matching share of the costs of construction of noise attenuation barriers on any alternate state highway where traffic has increased due to the destruction of that segment if the construction of those barriers is eligible for at least 25 percent funding from federal emergency relief funds and otherwise meets the requirements of Section 215.5. That amount is hereby appropriated to the department from that account, as a loan, that shall be repaid from funds made available under subdivision (d) of Section 215.5 for that construction.

(b) For purposes of this section, “natural disaster” has the meaning as defined in Section 8680.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

216.

(a) The noise level produced by the traffic on, or by the construction of, a state freeway shall be measured in the classrooms, libraries, multipurpose rooms, and spaces used for pupil personnel services of a public or private elementary or secondary school if the rooms or spaces are being used for the purpose for which they were constructed and they were constructed under any of the following circumstances:

(1) Prior to the award of the initial construction contract for the freeway route and prior to January 1, 1974. 

(2) After December 31, 1973, and prior to the issuance of a statement of present and projected noise levels of the freeway route by the department pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 65302 of the Government Code.

(3) Subsequent to the construction of the freeway but prior to any alteration or expansion of the freeway that results in a significant and perceptible increase in ambient noise levels in the rooms or spaces.

(b) The measurements shall be made at appropriate times during regular school hours and shall not include noise from sources that exceed the maximum permitted by law. 

(c) If the noise level produced from the freeway traffic, or the construction of the freeway, exceeds 55dBA, L10, or 52dBA, Leq., the department shall undertake a noise abatement program in any classroom, library, multipurpose room, or space used for pupil personnel services to reduce the freeway traffic noise level therein to 55dBA, L10, or 52dBA, Leq., or less, by, measures including, but not limited to, installing acoustical materials, eliminating windows, installing air-conditioning, or constructing sound baffle structures.

(d) If the department determines that the construction of the freeway will result in a noise level exceeding 55dBA, L10, or 52dBA, Leq., the department shall complete the temporary or permanent noise abatement program prior to commencing that construction, or as soon as practicable thereafter. 

(e) If it becomes necessary to convert the classrooms, libraries, multipurpose rooms, or spaces used for pupil personnel services to other school-related purposes because the freeway traffic noise level therein exceeds 55dBA, L10, or 52dBA, Leq., the department shall pay the cost of the conversions. 

(f) If the noise level generated from sources within and without the classrooms, libraries, multipurpose rooms, or spaces used for pupil personnel services exceeds 55dBA, L10, or 52dBA, Leq. prior to construction of the freeway or completion of the alteration or expansion of the freeway, as the case may be, and the noise from the freeway, or its construction, alteration, or expansion, also exceeds 55dBA, L10, or 52dBA, Leq., the department shall undertake a noise abatement program that will reduce the noise to its preconstruction, prealteration, or preexpansion level. 

(g) Priority for noise abatement programs shall be given to those public and private elementary and secondary classrooms, libraries, multipurpose rooms, and spaces used for pupil personnel services constructed in conformance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.5 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code or subject to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(h) As used in this section, dBA means decibels measured by the “A” weighting described in Section 3.1 of the American National Standard specification for sound level meters, S1.4-1971, approved April 27, 1971, and published by the American National Standards Institute. L10 is the sound level that is exceeded 10 percent of the time for the period under consideration and is a value which is an indicator of both the magnitude and frequency of occurrence of the loudest noise events. Leq. is the equivalent steady state sound which in a stated period of time would contain the same acoustic energy as the time-varying sound level during the same time period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

216.1.

As used in Section 216, “spaces used for pupil personnel services” means rooms that are used primarily for counseling, testing, or similar type services involving the presence of pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 969.)
-------------------------------------------

216.5.

(a) The department shall construct at least one demonstration noise attenuation barrier fabricated from rice straw upon meeting the conditions and requirements of this section.

(b) Prior to construction of the barrier specified in subdivision (a), the department shall identify an appropriate location, and shall develop separate cost estimates for constructing a barrier at that location using a standard noise attenuation barrier design and constructing the barrier using the rice straw design.

(c) If a noise barrier system fabricated from rice straw appears on the department’s list of approved noise barrier systems, the department shall, within one year, identify a suitable regularly programmed transportation project that includes a noise barrier element for construction of the demonstration noise barrier system. In making its project selection, the department shall consider projected completion schedules for potential candidate projects with the intent of completing the demonstration project expeditiously.

(d) The department shall not be required to construct the rice straw barrier specified in subdivision (a) until all the following have occurred:

(1) A noise barrier system fabricated from rice straw is approved by the department and appears on the department’s list of approved noise barrier systems.

(2) Funding has been secured and made available by the manufacturer of the selected rice straw system to offset any additional costs incurred by the department in using the rice straw barrier design based on the cost estimates prepared pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) A location has been identified for construction of the rice straw barrier system that meets safety, environmental, and related project requirements, and sufficient funding has been programmed and is available for construction of the barrier based on the cost estimate for the standard noise barrier design.

(e) The department may select any approved rice straw barrier system for use in the demonstration project as long as the manufacturer of the selected system secures and provides the required funding specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). If no manufacturer of an approved rice straw barrier system provides the required funding, the department shall not be required to complete the demonstration project.

(f) The department shall, on or before January 1, 2005, transmit to the Legislature a report regarding the implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 294.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Job Order Contracting [217. - 217.2.]

217.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Adjustment factor“ means the job order contractor’s competitively bid adjustment to the department’s prices as published in the unit price catalog.

(b) “Job order” means a firm, fixed-priced, lump-sum order issued by the department to a job order contractor for a definite project scope or work as compiled from the unit price catalog to be performed pursuant to a job order contract.

(c) “Job order” means a contract, awarded pursuant to this section, between the department and a licensed, bonded, and general liability insured contractor in which the contractor agrees to a
 fixed-period, fixed-unit price, and indefinite quantity contract that provides for the use of job orders for public works or maintenance projects.

(d) “Project” means the specific requirements and work to be accomplished by the job order contractor in connection with an individual job order.

(e) “Unit price catalog” means a book containing specific construction tasks and the unit prices to install or demolish that construction. The listed tasks shall be based on generally accepted industry standards and information, where available, for various items of work to be performed by the job order contractor. The prices shall include the cost of materials, labor, and equipment for performing the items of work. The prices shall not include overhead and profit. All unit prices shall be developed using local prevailing wages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, pursuant to Section 217.2.)
-------------------------------------------

217.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to enable the use of job order contracting as an option for constructing transportation and public works projects when it is anticipated that the use of this method will reduce procurement costs or expedite project completion in a manner that is not achievable through the design-bid-build method. It is the intent of the Legislature that this contracting method will improve the efficiency and efficacy of contracted work and not supplant work completed by the department’s field maintenance employees.

(b) (1) The department may use the procurement method outlined in this article for job order contracts.

(2) A job order
 contract of the department shall be competitively bid and awarded to the lowest bidder providing a qualified responsive bid.

(c) (1) The department may use job order contracting, consistent with this article, when undertaking the following projects:

(A) Highway maintenance or safety projects, including, but not limited to, bridge deck sealing, bridge and asphalt pavement overlays, concrete pavement slab work, repair and replacement of active transportation and complete streets facilities, joint seals, installation of new traffic safety devices, rumble strips, and traffic control devices, and other safety, bridge repair, or highway repair projects that are basic and repetitive.

(B) Traffic management and detection system installation, replacement, and repair.

(C) Tree removal.

(D) Clearing and grubbing.

(E) Culvert installation and repairs.

(F) Improvements to, removal of, and installation of facilities, systems, and traffic control devices needed to comply with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101–336).

(G) Facility repairs, including, but not limited to, building maintenance.

(H) Installation of stormwater pollution control devices.

(I) Safety barriers.

(2) No job order contract may be awarded for adding vehicular travel
 lanes.

(3) The department shall, when undertaking job order contracting for the projects specified in paragraph (1), establish a procedure to prequalify job order contractors for projects and shall prepare a set of documents for each job order contract. The documents shall include all of the following:

(A) A unit price catalog of construction tasks with preestablished unit prices.

(B) Job order contract specifications.

(C) Any other information deemed necessary to adequately describe the department’s needs.

(4) Based on the documents prepared under paragraph (3), the department shall develop a system for evaluating job order contract bids for the award of job order contracts. The award of
 a job order contract shall progress as follows:

(A) The department shall prepare a request for bids for job order contracts based on the documents prepared under paragraph (3) that invites prospective contractors to submit sealed bids in the manner prescribed by the department.

(B) Each bidding contractor shall include in its bid one or more adjustment factors to the established unit prices provided in the request for bids based on the advertised technical specifications.

(C) Each bidding job order contractor shall identify any subcontractors to be used for the job orders performed pursuant to the awarded job order contract pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(D) The award of job
 order contracts, if any, shall be made to one or more job order contractors that the department determines to be qualified and responsive based upon preestablished criteria to be determined by the department.

(5) Any job order contractor that is selected for a project pursuant to this article shall possess or obtain sufficient bonding to cover the contract amount for construction services and risk and liability insurance as the department may require.

(6) Nothing in this article is intended to affect, expand, alter, or limit any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c), the department may, in accordance with the requirements of Section 14838.7 of the Government Code, award a job order contract pursuant
 to this article with an estimated value of greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but less than the cost limit, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 10105 of the Public Contract Code, after obtaining written bid submittals from two or more certified small businesses, including microbusinesses, or from two or more disabled veteran business enterprises.

(e) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of no more than 12 months with the option of extending or renewing the job order contract for two 12-month periods. All extensions or renewals shall be priced as provided in the request for bids. An extension or renewal shall be mutually agreed to by the department and the job order contractor.

(f) On or before July 1 of each year, until July 1, 2033, the department shall publish on its internet website regarding the status of all active job order
 contracts and those job order contracts that expired in the previous year. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) A listing of all projects completed under each job order contract.

(2) The name of each job order contractor awarded a contract.

(3) The estimated and actual project costs.

(4) The estimated procurement time savings.

(5) A description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, proposal, or award of the job order contract, including, but not limited to, the resolution of the protests.

(6) A summary of small business usage.

(7) A summary of Labor Code violations, including, but not limited to, prevailing wage, apprenticeship, and health and safety statutes to the extent information is readily available.

(8) The percentage of the project completed by subcontractors certified by the Department of General Services as small business and disabled veteran business enterprise.

(9) Recommendations regarding the most appropriate uses for the job order contract process.

(g) Job order contracts shall be monitored by the department’s labor compliance program for compliance with federal and state labor laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, pursuant to Section 217.2.)
-------------------------------------------

217.2.

This article shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 6.5, commencing with Section 217.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Safety Roadside Rests [218. - 226.5.]

218.

The commission and the department shall plan, design, and construct a system of safety roadside rests on the state highway system outside of units of the state park system, and the cost thereof shall be payable from the State Highway Account. The department shall maintain such safety roadside rests and the costs thereof shall be payable from the State Highway Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

219.

In planning such system of safety roadside rests, the department is directed to generally follow these criteria:

(a) Safety roadside rests should be provided so that, in combination with other stopping facilities, there shall be facilities available at intervals of approximately one-half hours normal driving time.

(b) On highway entrances to large metropolitan areas, safety roadside rests may be provided.

(c) On high-volume highways consisting of four or more lanes, safety roadside rests should be provided on both sides of the highways; on all other highways only single safety roadside rests should be provided.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), on high-volume highways more safety roadside rests may be planned at strategic locations where they appear to be necessary or desirable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1132.)
-------------------------------------------

220.

In designing safety roadside rests, the department shall design only those safety roadside rests which are reasonably economical and which will provide the motorist a place where he may stop for a short time during daytime and nighttime hours. The Legislature recognizes that the size of such safety roadside rests, together with the facilities therein, will differ according to location and potential use. Such safety roadside rests may contain, among other things, depending upon the size and use thereof, parking places for vehicles, picnic tables, sanitary facilities, telephones, water, landscaping, tourist information panels, traveler service information facilities, and facilities for the distribution of current news. Such safety roadside rests shall not contain camping or recreational facilities.

The safety roadside rests located on that portion of Route 5 in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta area may also contain displays and examples of California agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 378.)
-------------------------------------------

220.5.

(a) The department shall authorize the placement of vending machines in safety roadside rests, unless prohibited by federal laws, rules, or regulations.

(b) The department, pursuant to provisions contained in paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Section 2 of the Act of June 20, 1936, commonly known as the Randolph-Sheppard Act, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 107a(a)(5)), shall give preference for the placement of vending machines in safety roadside rest areas along state highways to vendors operating under the Business Enterprises Program for the Blind in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 19625) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 10 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) The department may determine which safety roadside rest areas are suitable for inclusion in the vending machine program and the appropriate location within each roadside rest area for the placement of the machines, and the department shall approve the design and construction of any shelter or structure that may be required for the machines.

(d) (1) The department shall determine the costs for any maintenance, operations, design review, or other activities related to the vending machines
 and, except as provided in paragraph (2), shall be reimbursed for those costs from the revenues derived from the operation of the machines.

(2) (A) The department shall not be reimbursed for utility costs incurred by vendors operating under the Business Enterprises Program for the Blind and shall pay for those utility costs using state funds.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “utility costs” includes fees incurred for providing electricity service, water service, sewage service, or any other similar service.

(e) Any money received by the department for authorizing the placement of, or from the income from, the vending machines shall be transferred to the State Highway Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 173, Sec. 1.   (AB 1353)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

221.

The department shall, to the extent feasible, post at appropriate safety roadside rests information regarding missing children provided by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 11114.1 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 249, Sec. 13.   Effective July 3, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

222.

The department may accept grants on behalf of the State and may accept financial or other assistance for, or in aid of, safety roadside rests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

223.

(a) The department may contract with other governmental agencies or private organizations or individuals for the construction and operation of traveler service information facilities and for the maintenance of all or any of these safety roadside rests where it deems it necessary or desirable.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), Section 19130 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, the department may contract with public and private nonprofit organizations pursuant to Section 19404 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for the operation of traveler service information facilities and for the maintenance of all or any of these safety roadside rests where it deems it necessary or desirable. Contracts entered into pursuant to this subdivision shall not cause displacement of civil service employees. For purposes of this section, “displacement” includes layoff, demotion, involuntary transfer to a new class, involuntary transfer to a new location requiring a change of residence, and time base reductions. “Displacement” does not include changes in shifts or days off, or reassignment to other positions within the same class and general location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 215.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

223.5.

(a) The department shall develop a policy for the use of restroom facilities at safety roadside rests by disabled travelers at those locations on state highways which have separate restroom facilities for disabled persons. The policy shall permit a disabled person to be accompanied in the restroom by his or her attendant, who may be a person of the opposite sex, to assist the disabled person. 

(b) The policy shall provide for the design and placement of special signs at the safety roadside rests clearly indicating that it is permissible for a person of the opposite sex to accompany a disabled person into the restroom to assist the disabled person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

224.

It shall be unlawful for any person to throw or deposit any substance in a safety roadside rest other than in a receptacle provided for that purpose. It shall be unlawful for any person to deposit in the receptacles provided for refuse in a safety roadside rest any refuse or waste from homes, farms, or commercial establishments, or other material which does not arise out of the use of the safety roadside rest by a member of the traveling public. The violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 42002 of the Vehicle Code, and all of the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing at Section 40300) of Division 17 of the Vehicle Code shall apply to an offense committed under this section the same as if such offense were made an offense by the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

225.

(a) The department may enact rules and regulations governing the time and manner of use of safety roadside rests, and all state laws and rules and regulations of the department shall be administered and enforced within the safety roadside rests by all employees of the state authorized by the department to do so and by all peace officers.

(b) No person shall engage in any activity within a safety roadside rest area or vista point prohibited by rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(c) A violation of subdivision (b) is an infraction. A second or subsequent conviction of a violation of subdivision (b) is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   Effective July 15, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

225.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22520.5 or 22520.6 of the Vehicle Code, and except as specifically authorized by this article, no person shall display, sell, offer for sale, or otherwise vend or attempt to vend any merchandise, foodstuff, or service within any vista point or safety roadside rest area.

(b) No person shall solicit money within any vista point or safety roadside rest for any purpose.

(c) When requested by a uniformed member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or other peace officer, any person or persons and any property may be relocated to a specified area of a vista point or rest area, or may be required to quit the premises, as directed by that officer, if, in the opinion of the officer, the person’s presence or activity or the presence of the property, creates, or may reasonably be expected to create, a safety problem , hazard, or nuisance, either on or near the vista point or safety roadside rest area.

(d) To the extent the provisions of any regulations adopted by the department conflict with this section, those provisions are void, and permission given pursuant to those provisions for a person to engage in activities prohibited by subdivision (a) or (b) of this section is revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

226.

Areas comprising such safety roadside rests shall be deemed a part of the state highway right-of-way for all purposes, including those set forth in Section 731.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

226.5.

(a) Unless prohibited by federal law or regulation, the department, to promote public safety and convenience, may construct, operate, and maintain a maximum of six new safety roadside rest area units as a joint economic development demonstration project where there is a public need for a rest area, and the joint economic development proposal will result in an economic savings to the state.

(b) All of the following apply to the demonstration project safety roadside rest area units:

(1) Contracts for construction, operation, and maintenance of facilities in the demonstration project roadside rest areas shall be awarded on the basis of competitive bidding.

(2) The department may permit commercial operations within the units if the operations are traveler-related activities and no alcoholic beverages are sold within the rest area facility.

(3) Law enforcement responsibilities within the units are the same as are currently provided on the state highway system.

(4) The department shall submit a status report to the Assembly Committee on Transportation and the Senate Committee on Transportation one year following construction of the initial unit and annually thereafter.

(5) The department holds, or affords the opportunity for, a public hearing for each proposed unit so that local community members who may be affected by rest area economic development and other interested parties may comment on the proposed project.

(c) Any money received by the state for the demonstration project shall be deposited by the department in the State Highway Account.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 227 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1228, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Loma Prieta Earthquake-Cypress Neighborhood Relief Act [227. - 227.1.]

227.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The neighborhood surrounding the former Cypress section of Route 880 in Oakland has suffered great and unusual hardship due to the freeway’s collapse during the 1989 Loma Prieta Earthquake and its subsequent demolition.

(2) In addition to the hardship and suffering related to the freeway disaster, the Cypress neighborhood had endured for many years the pollution, noise, and environmental degradation of having a freeway cut through the neighborhood.
